District of Columbia statutes.
10-1221.04

Creation of the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area.

(a)

There is created a TIF area designated as the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area. The New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area is defined as the real property located in Lot 26 (formerly known as Lots 18, 21, 22, 24, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845), Square 370, bounded by 9th Street, N.W., 10th Street, N.W., L Street, N.W., and Massachusetts Avenue, N.W. As provided under § 10-1221.03, the Available Tax Increment from the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area shall be deposited in the New Convention Center Hotel Fund and may be used as provided herein, including as security for the repayment of the bonds.

(b)

The base year for determination of Available Sales Tax Revenues from the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area shall be the tax year preceding the year when this subchapter becomes effective and the base year for determination of Available Real Property Tax Revenues from the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area shall be the fiscal year of the District when this subchapter becomes effective and the initial assessed value to be used in making such determination shall be the assessed value of each lot of taxable real property in the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area on September 19, 2006.

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 104, 53 DCR 5430
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-144, § 2(d), 55 DCR 2527
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-78, § 3(c), 56 DCR 6959
This section is referenced in § 10-1221.01.
D.C. Law 17-144 rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) There is hereby created a TIF area designated as the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area. The New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area is defined as the real property located in lots 801 through 805, 40, 838, 839, 62, 65 through 67, 842, 848, 859, and 878, square 369, bounded by M Street, N.W., 9th Street, N.W., L Street, N.W., and 10th Street, N.W., and square 370, bounded by 9th Street, N.W., 10th Street, N.W., M Street, N.W., and Massachusetts Avenue, N.W. As provided under § 10-1221.03, the Available Tax Increment from the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area shall be deposited in the New Convention Center Hotel Fund and may be used as provided therein, including as security for the repayment of the bonds.”
D.C. Law 18-78, in subsec. (a), substituted “Lot 26 (formerly known as Lots 18, 21, 22, 24, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845), Square 370” for “Lots 18, 21, 22, 24, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845, Square 370”.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 104 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-186, August 12, 2009, 56 DCR 6967).